Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-106.04
Retirement benefits; certain employees; cost-of-living adjustment; how computed.

Commencing on July 22, 1978, to reflect changes in the cost of living and wage levels that have occurred subsequent to the date of retirement of certain persons of the University of Nebraska who have earned retirement benefits while in the employ of the University of Nebraska prior to September 1, 1961, and who have retired prior to July 22, 1978:

(1) The total accumulation of retirement benefits earned under the retirement plan in force prior to September 1, 1961, shall be adjusted by the percentage of increase in the employer's wage levels which shall mean the average of salaries paid for the nine-month academic year to employees from the year of each person's retirement to the fiscal year ending June 30, 1977, which total, as adjusted, shall then be the total accumulation of retirement benefits prior to September 1, 1961; and

(2) The two thousand four hundred dollar maximum benefits provision under the university retirement plan in effect prior to September 1, 1961, shall be removed.

Laws 1978, LB 198, § 1.